Indiana, session 2026, HB1180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-319.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 319.5. "Retaliatory action", for
purposes of IC 16-28-4-8, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-28-4-8(a).
SECTION 2. IC 16-28-1-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The state health commissioner, or the state
health commissioner's designee, shall establish a work group to
study methods to reduce and prevent resident neglect in health
facilities. The work group must include the following members:
(1) Representatives of health facilities.
(2) Representatives of family members of residents.
(3) Representatives of advocacy groups that advocate for
individuals who reside in health facilities.
The state health commissioner or the state health commissioner's
designee shall chair the work group and schedule and hold at least
2026 IN 1180—LS 6702/DI 104


four (4) meetings.
(b) Before November 1, 2027, the state department, in
coordination with the work group, shall prepare and submit a
written report to the general assembly in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 with the actions of the work group and any
recommendations by the work group to reduce or prevent neglect
in health facilities.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 16-28-2-13.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.2. (a) A health facility licensed
under this article shall designate at least one (1) employee of the
health facility to act as the family advocacy liaison for:
(1) residents of the health facility; and
(2) a designated member of the resident's family or the
resident's health care representative;
that assists a resident or an individual described in subdivision (2)
in obtaining information concerning the resident, including records
and responses to grievances filed with the health facility by the
resident or individual described in subdivision (2) concerning the
resident.
(b) A health facility shall provide the name and contact
information of the health facility's designated family advocacy
liaison to each resident and individual described in subsection
(a)(2).
(c) A health facility shall offer grief support resources and
counseling to family members after the death of a resident.
SECTION 4. IC 16-28-2-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Each health facility licensed under this article
shall establish and implement an independent third party review
process of a complaint filed in writing by a resident or an
individual described in section 13.2(a)(2) of this chapter when the
complaint makes allegations concerning neglect of the resident.
(b) The independent third party review process established by
a health facility must meet the following requirements:
(1) Be submitted in writing by the health facility to the
independent third party for review and investigation not later
than seven (7) calendar days from the filing of the complaint
described in subsection (a).
(2) Submit a copy of the written submission to the
independent third party under subdivision (1) to the
2026 IN 1180—LS 6702/DI 104


individual who submitted the negligence complaint.
(3) Allow the independent third party access to any records,
staff, or other relevant information concerning the complaint
in a timely manner and necessary for the independent third
party to investigate the complaint.
(c) A health facility may not do any of the following concerning
a negligence complaint described in this section:
(1) Require the resident or individual who filed the negligence
complaint to reimburse the health facility for the independent
third party review under this section.
(2) Take any other adverse action against the resident or the
individual who submitted the complaint unless recommended
by the independent third party, the state department, or a
court of law.
(d) A health facility shall ensure that a resident or an individual
described in section 13.2(a)(2) of this chapter is provided timely
access to the resident's records and any response to a filed
complaint.
SECTION 5. IC 16-28-4-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "retaliatory action"
means the reprimand, discharge, suspension, demotion, denial of
promotion or transfer, or change in the terms and conditions of
employment of an employee of a health facility that is taken in
retaliation for the employee's involvement in a protected activity
as set forth in this section.
(b) A health facility may not take any retaliatory action against
an employee of the health facility because the employee does any
of the following:
(1) Discloses or threatens to disclose to a supervisor or to the
public an activity, inaction, policy, or practice implemented
by a health facility that the employee reasonably believes is in
violation of a federal or state law, rule, or regulation.
(2) Provides information to or testifies before any law
enforcement or governmental entity conducting an
investigation, hearing, or inquiry into any violation of a
federal or state law, rule, or regulation.
(3) Assists or participates in a proceeding to enforce the
provisions of this article.
(c) A violation of this section occurs only if there is a finding
that:
(1) the employee of the health facility engaged in conduct
2026 IN 1180—LS 6702/DI 104


described in subsection (b); and
(2) the employee's conduct was a contributing factor in the
retaliatory action alleged by the employee.
However, a health facility has not violated this section if the health
facility demonstrates, by clear and convincing evidence, that the
health facility would have taken the unfavorable employment
action against the employee in the absence of the conduct described
in subsection (b).
(d) If a court finds that a health facility has taken retaliatory
action against an employee in violation of this section, the employee
may be awarded all relief necessary to make the employee whole
and to prevent future violations of this section. Relief may include
any of the following:
(1) Reinstatement of the individual to the same or equivalent
position held before the retaliatory action was taken.
(2) Two (2) times the amount of back pay that is owed to the
individual.
(3) Interest on the back pay that is owed to the individual.
(4) Compensation for any special damages sustained by the
individual as a result of the retaliatory action being taken,
including costs and expenses of litigation and reasonable
attorney's fees.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to diminish the rights,
privileges, or remedies of an individual under any other federal or
state law, rule, regulation, or employment contract.
SECTION 6. IC 16-28-11-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. After the death of a resident,
the health facility shall offer grief support to the deceased
resident's family.
SECTION 7. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "health facility" refers to an entity licensed under
IC 16-28 as a comprehensive care facility.
(b) The legislative council is urged to assign to the appropriate
study committee during the 2026 legislative interim the task of
studying whether the state should impose minimum staff-to-patient
ratios for health facilities.
(c) This SECTION expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1180—LS 6702/DI 104